apertium-rus.rus.dix
    <pardef n="приб/ыть__vblex_perf">
      <e><p><l>ыть</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>удь</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>удьте</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ыв</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ывши</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ывш</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ыл</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ыла</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ыло</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ыли</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уду</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>удем</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>удешь</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>удете</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>удет</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>удут</l><r>ыть<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="оглян/уться__vblex_perf">
      <e><p><l>уться</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ись</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>итесь</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>увшись</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>увш</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/><p><l>ся</l><r></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>улся</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>улась</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>улось</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>улись</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>усь</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>емся</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ешься</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>етесь</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ется</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>утся</l><r>уться<s n="vblex"/><s n="perf"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="вел/еть__vblex_dual">
      <e><p><l>и</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ите</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>евш</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ел</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ела</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ело</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ели</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>я</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ящ</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ю</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>им</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ишь</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ите</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ит</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ят</l><r>еть<s n="vblex"/><s n="dual"/><s n="nonpast"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 
    <pardef n="вор/овать__vblex_impf">
      <e><p><l>овать</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уем</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ующ</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>овавш</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="actv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__английск/ий"/></e>
      <e><p><l>ованн</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p><par n="BASE__счастлив/ый"/></e>
      <e><p><l>уя</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pprs"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овав</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pp"/><s n="adv"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>ую</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уем</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уешь</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уете</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ует</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уют</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="pres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>овал</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овала</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овало</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>овали</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="past"/><s n="mfn"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e><p><l>уй</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>уйте</l><r>овать<s n="vblex"/><s n="impf"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 

    <e lm="велеть"><i>вел</i><par n="вел/еть__vblex_dual"/></e>
    <e lm="волновать"><i>волн</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="воровать"><i>вор</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="демонстрировать"><i>демонстрир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="затянуться"><i>затян</i><par n="оглян/уться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="здравствовать"><i>здравств</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="интересовать"><i>интерес</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="контролировать"><i>контролир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="регулировать"><i>регулир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="планировать"><i>планир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="миновать"><i>мин</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="оглянуться"><i>оглян</i><par n="оглян/уться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="откликнуться"><i>откликн</i><par n="оглян/уться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="переглянуться"><i>переглян</i><par n="оглян/уться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="потянуться"><i>потян</i><par n="оглян/уться__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="преследовать"><i>преслед</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="прибыть"><i>приб</i><par n="приб/ыть__vblex_perf"/></e>
    <e lm="пробовать"><i>проб</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="свидетельствовать"><i>свидетельств</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="торговать"><i>торг</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="требовать"><i>треб</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
    <e lm="целовать"><i>цел</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="адаптировать"><i>адаптир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="активизировать"><i>активизир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="анализировать"><i>анализир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="ассоциировать"><i>ассоциир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="блокировать"><i>блокир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="бойкотировать"><i>бойкотир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="браковать"><i>брак</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="пропагандировать"><i>пропагандир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="протестовать"><i>протест</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="публиковать"><i>публик</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="ратифицировать"><i>ратифицир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="реализировать"><i>реализир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="реализовать"><i>реализ</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="резюмировать"><i>резюмир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="ремонтировать"><i>ремонтир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="репрессировать"><i>репрессир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="реформировать"><i>реформир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="стартовать"><i>старт</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="стимулировать"><i>стимулир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
<e lm="травмировать"><i>травмир</i><par n="вор/овать__vblex_impf"/></e>
